Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB124.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(a) of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 5. Proposed regulations; procedures for review.(a) On the same date that an agency submits a proposed regulation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication of notice of proposed rulemaking in the Pennsylvania Bulletin as required by the Commonwealth Documents Law, the agency shall submit to the commission and the committees a copy of the proposed regulation and a regulatory analysis form which includes the following:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 (15) If the proposed regulation accepts or adopts guidance from the World Health Organization, United Nations or the World Economic Forum, all of the following:(i) A statement demonstrating how the guidance from the World Health Organization, United Nations or the World Economic Forum applies to this Commonwealth.(ii) A description of any data stating that the guidance from the World Health Organization, United Nations or the World Economic Forum applies to this Commonwealth. The description shall include a detailed explanation of how the data was obtained and why the data is acceptable data. An agency advocating that any data is acceptable data shall have the burden of proving that the data is acceptable.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0124PN0105 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516